langs/is/common-aff.d/23_fallbeyging_kvk.aff
#kvk et agr i
SFX 13	N 6
SFX 13	ur      i       ur
SFX 13	0       i       u[^r]
SFX 13	0       i       [^u].
SFX 13	ur      ar       ur
SFX 13	0       ar       u[^r]
SFX 13	0       ar       [^u].

#kvk vb et agr
SFX 14	N 1
SFX 14	a	u

#kvk vb et gr
SFX 15	N 4
SFX 15	0	n
SFX 15	a	una
SFX 15	a	unni
SFX 15	a	unnar

#kvk vb ft agr
SFX 16	N 2
SFX 16	r	m
SFX 16	ur	a

#kvk vb ft gr
SFX 17	N 3
SFX 17	0	nar
SFX 17	r	num
SFX 17	ur	anna

#kvk sb et agr
SFX 18	N 1
SFX 18	0	ar

#kvk sb et gr
SFX 19	N 4
SFX 19  0       in
SFX 19  0       ina
SFX 19  0       inni
SFX 19	0	arinnar

#kvk sb ft agr
SFX 20	N 6
SFX 20  ir	um	[^a]nir
SFX 20  ir	um	[^n]ir
SFX 20  anir	unum
SFX 20	ar	um
SFX 20  ir	a
SFX 20	ar	a

#kvk sb ft gr
SFX 21	N 7
SFX 21  0	nar
SFX 21  ir	unum	[^a]nir
SFX 21  ir	unum	[^n]ir
SFX 21	anir	ununum
SFX 21	ar	unum
SFX 21  ir	anna
SFX 21	ar	anna

#kvk vb ft agr
SFX 24	N 2
SFX 24	r       m
SFX 24	ur      na

#kvk vb ft gr
SFX 25	N 3
SFX 25	0       nar
SFX 25	r       num
SFX 25	ur      nanna

#kvk sb et agr u
SFX 31	N 2
SFX 31	0	ar
SFX 31	0	u

#kvk sb et gr u
SFX 32	N 4
SFX 32	0	in
SFX 32	0	una
SFX 32	0	unni
SFX 32	0	arinnar
